Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Chapter 5. Geological and Mineral Survey

§ 53-5-1.
Natural resources commission to assume duties and responsibilities of geological, economic and topographical survey board.

The Mississippi Commission on Natural Resources shall be the geological, economic and topographical survey board and shall exercise the duties and responsibilities of the geological, economic and topographical survey board through the bureau of geology and energy resources of the Mississippi Department of Natural Resources, insofar as practicable under the provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 49, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The words “Geological, Economic and Topographical Survey Board” wherever they may appear in the laws of the State of Mississippi, shall be construed to mean the Mississippi Commission on Natural Resources.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-01; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§§ 53-5-3 and 53-5-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§53-5-3. [Codes, 1942, § 8954-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 3]

§53-5-5. [Codes, 1942, § 8954.06; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 6]

§ 53-5-7.
Objects of survey.

The object of the survey shall be:

An examination of the mineral natural resources of the State, viz: the metalliferous deposits, petroleum, natural gas, as well as building stones, clays, coals, cements, waters, and all other mineral substances of value.

The investigation, mapping, and compilation of reports upon the water supplies, water power of the State, gauging the streams, etc., with reference to their application to irrigation, protection from overflow and other purposes.

Studies and reports on constructional materials and their values.

The preparation and completion of special geologic, topographic, and economic maps to illustrate the resources of the State.

The preparation of special reports with necessary illustrations and maps which shall embrace both a general and detailed description of the geological and natural resources of the state. Said reports are to be provided in sufficient number for distribution to the educational institutions of the State, the State Library and as demand may otherwise justify.

The consideration of such other kindred scientific, educational, and economic questions as, in the judgment of the Board, shall be deemed of value to the people of the State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-07; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).

§ 53-5-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

[Codes, 1942, § 8954.08; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 8]

§ 53-5-11.
Reports to be published.

The regular and special reports of the survey, with proper illustrations and maps shall be printed as the board may direct, and the reports shall be distributed or sold by the board as interest of the state and of science may demand, and all money obtained by the sale of the reports shall be paid into the state geological survey publications fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).

§ 53-5-13.
Survey employees may go on lands.

For the purpose of making the survey hereinbefore provided for, it shall be lawful for the persons employed by the survey in making the same to enter upon all lands within the boundaries of this state, but this section shall not be construed as authorizing unnecessary interference with private rights.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).

§ 53-5-15.
Board may cooperate with United States Geological Survey.

The board of the Mississippi Geological Survey, in the conduct of its work may confer with, and when deemed advisable, may act in cooperation with the United States Geological Survey or other federal agencies in making and publishing the results of topographic, geologic and hydrographic surveys in the State of Mississippi. Such cooperative effort may be directed by either of the contracting parties at the discretion of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 477, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1958).

§ 53-5-17.
Geological and mineral resource surveys; expenditures by counties and municipalities.

The boards of supervisors of the various counties of this state, the board of aldermen of any municipality, or the governing authorities of any governmental subdivision of the state are hereby authorized in their discretion to expend out of their general funds an amount up to the estimated cost of a geological and mineral resource survey of any such governmental subdivision, such survey to be performed by the Mississippi Geological, Economic and Topographical Survey, the aforesaid survey to be performed for the purpose of exploring, mapping, testing and publishing reports of the mineral natural resources and geology of the aforesaid governmental subdivisions. The findings of such survey shall include a statement regarding the quantity and quality of any mineral or natural resource found, as well as advice and recommendations as to the possible utilization of any minerals or other substances found by reason of such survey and any recommendations for further study and research beyond the facilities of the Mississippi Geological, Economic and Topographical Survey.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-21; Laws, 1966, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 17, 1966).

§ 53-5-19.
Governmental subdivisions may cooperate and share costs of survey.

Two or more governmental subdivisions may combine upon the agreement of the governing boards thereof and may contribute funds as agreed to among themselves to such survey as authorized by Section 53-5-17, so as to facilitate a cooperative survey of more than one governmental subdivision at the same time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-22; Laws, 1966, ch. 312, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 17, 1966).

§ 53-5-21.
Payment of costs of survey.

Payments to the agency or agencies making the surveys authorized in Section 53-5-17 may be paid during the performance of the survey. However, the total of such payments shall not exceed ninety per cent (90%) of the estimated total cost until after the survey or surveys are finally completed and formally accepted by the governing board or boards having the survey made. Payments may be extended over the term of office of the governing board or boards having such surveys made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-23; Laws, 1966, ch. 312, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 17, 1966).

§ 53-5-23.
Priorities for performance of work.

The Mississippi Geological, Economic and Topographical Survey may set up a system of priorities for the performance of any of the work authorized in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8954-24; Laws, 1966, ch. 312, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 17, 1966).